lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 10049 Y 2
SFX 10049 ikšti ikšti/468 . 336
SFX 10049 ikštis ikštis/468 . 336

SFX 10050 Y 2
SFX 10050 ikšti ikšti/469 . 336
SFX 10050 ikštis ikštis/469 . 336

SFX 10051 Y 2
SFX 10051 ikšti ikšti/470 . 336
SFX 10051 ikštis ikštis/470 . 336

SFX 10052 Y 2
SFX 10052 ikšti ikšti/471 . 336
SFX 10052 ikštis ikštis/471 . 336

SFX 10053 Y 2
SFX 10053 ikšti ikšti/472 . 336
SFX 10053 ikštis ikštis/472 . 336

SFX 10054 Y 2
SFX 10054 ikšti ikšti/473 . 336
SFX 10054 ikštis ikštis/473 . 336

SFX 10065 Y 2
SFX 10065 ikšti yška/474 . 337
SFX 10065 ikštis yškasi/474 . 337

SFX 10066 Y 2
SFX 10066 ikšti yška/475 . 337
SFX 10066 ikštis yškasi/475 . 337

SFX 10067 Y 2
SFX 10067 ikšti yška/476 . 337
SFX 10067 ikštis yškasi/476 . 337

SFX 10068 Y 2
SFX 10068 ikšti yška/477 . 337
SFX 10068 ikštis yškasi/477 . 337

SFX 10069 Y 2
SFX 10069 ikšti yška/478 . 337
SFX 10069 ikštis yškasi/478 . 337

SFX 10070 Y 2
SFX 10070 ikšti yška/479 . 337
SFX 10070 ikštis yškasi/479 . 337

SFX 10071 Y 2
SFX 10071 ikšti yška/480 . 337
SFX 10071 ikštis yškasi/480 . 337

SFX 10072 Y 2
SFX 10072 ikšti yška/481 . 337
SFX 10072 ikštis yškasi/481 . 337

SFX 10073 Y 2
SFX 10073 ikšti yška/482 . 337
SFX 10073 ikštis yškasi/482 . 337

SFX 10083 Y 1
SFX 10083 ikšti yškie/483 . 337

SFX 10084 Y 1
SFX 10084 ikštis yškie/484 . 337

SFX 10085 Y 2
SFX 10085 ikšti iško/485 . 338
SFX 10085 ikštis iškosi/485 . 338

SFX 10086 Y 2
SFX 10086 ikšti iško/486 . 338
SFX 10086 ikštis iškosi/486 . 338

SFX 10087 Y 2
SFX 10087 ikšti iško/487 . 338
SFX 10087 ikštis iškosi/487 . 338

SFX 10091 Y 2
SFX 10091 imšti imšti/464 . 336
SFX 10091 imštis imštis/464 . 336

SFX 10092 Y 2
SFX 10092 imšti imšti/465 . 336
SFX 10092 imštis imštis/465 . 336

SFX 10093 Y 2
SFX 10093 imšti imšti/466 . 336
SFX 10093 imštis imštis/466 . 336

SFX 10094 Y 2
SFX 10094 imšti imšti/467 . 336
SFX 10094 imštis imštis/467 . 336

SFX 10095 Y 2
SFX 10095 imšti imšti/468 . 336
SFX 10095 imštis imštis/468 . 336

SFX 10096 Y 2
SFX 10096 imšti imšti/469 . 336
SFX 10096 imštis imštis/469 . 336

SFX 10097 Y 2
SFX 10097 imšti imšti/470 . 336
SFX 10097 imštis imštis/470 . 336

SFX 10098 Y 2
SFX 10098 imšti imšti/471 . 336
SFX 10098 imštis imštis/471 . 336

SFX 10099 Y 2
SFX 10099 imšti imšti/472 . 336
SFX 10099 imštis imštis/472 . 336

SFX 10100 Y 2
SFX 10100 imšti imšti/473 . 336
SFX 10100 imštis imštis/473 . 336

SFX 10111 Y 2
SFX 10111 imšti emša/474 . 337
SFX 10111 imštis emšasi/474 . 337

SFX 10112 Y 2
SFX 10112 imšti emša/475 . 337
SFX 10112 imštis emšasi/475 . 337

SFX 10113 Y 2
SFX 10113 imšti emša/476 . 337
SFX 10113 imštis emšasi/476 . 337

SFX 10114 Y 2
SFX 10114 imšti emša/477 . 337
SFX 10114 imštis emšasi/477 . 337

SFX 10115 Y 2
SFX 10115 imšti emša/478 . 337
SFX 10115 imštis emšasi/478 . 337

SFX 10116 Y 2
SFX 10116 imšti emša/479 . 337
SFX 10116 imštis emšasi/479 . 337

SFX 10117 Y 2
SFX 10117 imšti emša/480 . 337
SFX 10117 imštis emšasi/480 . 337

SFX 10118 Y 2
SFX 10118 imšti emša/481 . 337
SFX 10118 imštis emšasi/481 . 337

SFX 10119 Y 2
SFX 10119 imšti emša/482 . 337
SFX 10119 imštis emšasi/482 . 337

SFX 10129 Y 1
SFX 10129 imšti emšie/483 . 337

SFX 10130 Y 1
SFX 10130 imštis emšie/484 . 337

SFX 10131 Y 2
SFX 10131 imšti imšo/485 . 338
SFX 10131 imštis imšosi/485 . 338

SFX 10132 Y 2
SFX 10132 imšti imšo/486 . 338
SFX 10132 imštis imšosi/486 . 338

SFX 10133 Y 2
SFX 10133 imšti imšo/487 . 338
SFX 10133 imštis imšosi/487 . 338

SFX 10137 Y 2
SFX 10137 inti inti/464 . 336
SFX 10137 intis intis/464 . 336

SFX 10138 Y 2
SFX 10138 inti inti/465 . 336
SFX 10138 intis intis/465 . 336

SFX 10139 Y 2
SFX 10139 inti inti/466 . 336
SFX 10139 intis intis/466 . 336

SFX 10140 Y 2
SFX 10140 inti inti/467 . 336
SFX 10140 intis intis/467 . 336

SFX 10141 Y 2
SFX 10141 inti inti/468 . 336
SFX 10141 intis intis/468 . 336

SFX 10142 Y 2
SFX 10142 inti inti/469 . 336
SFX 10142 intis intis/469 . 336

SFX 10143 Y 2
SFX 10143 inti inti/470 . 336
SFX 10143 intis intis/470 . 336

SFX 10144 Y 2
SFX 10144 inti inti/471 . 336
SFX 10144 intis intis/471 . 336

SFX 10145 Y 2
SFX 10145 inti inti/472 . 336
SFX 10145 intis intis/472 . 336

SFX 10146 Y 2
SFX 10146 inti inti/473 . 336
SFX 10146 intis intis/473 . 336

SFX 10157 Y 2
SFX 10157 inti įsta/474 . 337
SFX 10157 intis įstasi/474 . 337

SFX 10158 Y 2
SFX 10158 inti įsta/475 . 337
SFX 10158 intis įstasi/475 . 337

SFX 10159 Y 2
SFX 10159 inti įsta/476 . 337
SFX 10159 intis įstasi/476 . 337

SFX 10160 Y 2
SFX 10160 inti įsta/477 . 337
SFX 10160 intis įstasi/477 . 337

SFX 10161 Y 2
SFX 10161 inti įsta/478 . 337
SFX 10161 intis įstasi/478 . 337

SFX 10162 Y 2
SFX 10162 inti įsta/479 . 337
SFX 10162 intis įstasi/479 . 337

SFX 10163 Y 2
SFX 10163 inti įsta/480 . 337
SFX 10163 intis įstasi/480 . 337

SFX 10164 Y 2
SFX 10164 inti įsta/481 . 337
SFX 10164 intis įstasi/481 . 337

SFX 10165 Y 2
SFX 10165 inti įsta/482 . 337
SFX 10165 intis įstasi/482 . 337

SFX 10175 Y 1
SFX 10175 inti įstie/483 . 337

SFX 10176 Y 1
SFX 10176 intis įstie/484 . 337

SFX 10177 Y 2
SFX 10177 inti ino/485 . 338
SFX 10177 intis inosi/485 . 338

SFX 10178 Y 2
SFX 10178 inti ino/486 . 338
SFX 10178 intis inosi/486 . 338

SFX 10179 Y 2
SFX 10179 inti ino/487 . 338
SFX 10179 intis inosi/487 . 338

SFX 10183 Y 2
SFX 10183 kti kti/464 . 336
SFX 10183 ktis ktis/464 . 336

SFX 10184 Y 2
SFX 10184 kti kti/465 . 336
SFX 10184 ktis ktis/465 . 336

SFX 10185 Y 2
SFX 10185 kti kti/466 . 336
SFX 10185 ktis ktis/466 . 336

SFX 10186 Y 2
SFX 10186 kti kti/467 . 336
SFX 10186 ktis ktis/467 . 336

SFX 10187 Y 2
SFX 10187 kti kti/468 . 336
SFX 10187 ktis ktis/468 . 336

SFX 10188 Y 2
SFX 10188 kti kti/469 . 336
SFX 10188 ktis ktis/469 . 336

SFX 10189 Y 2
SFX 10189 kti kti/470 . 336
SFX 10189 ktis ktis/470 . 336

SFX 10190 Y 2
SFX 10190 kti kti/471 . 336
SFX 10190 ktis ktis/471 . 336

SFX 10191 Y 2
SFX 10191 kti kti/472 . 336
SFX 10191 ktis ktis/472 . 336

SFX 10192 Y 2
SFX 10192 kti kti/473 . 336
SFX 10192 ktis ktis/473 . 336

SFX 10203 Y 2
SFX 10203 kti eka/474 . 337
SFX 10203 ktis ekasi/474 . 337

SFX 10204 Y 2
SFX 10204 kti eka/475 . 337
SFX 10204 ktis ekasi/475 . 337

SFX 10205 Y 2
SFX 10205 kti eka/476 . 337
SFX 10205 ktis ekasi/476 . 337

SFX 10206 Y 2
SFX 10206 kti eka/477 . 337
SFX 10206 ktis ekasi/477 . 337

SFX 10207 Y 2
SFX 10207 kti eka/478 . 337
SFX 10207 ktis ekasi/478 . 337

SFX 10208 Y 2
SFX 10208 kti eka/479 . 337
SFX 10208 ktis ekasi/479 . 337

SFX 10209 Y 2
SFX 10209 kti eka/480 . 337
SFX 10209 ktis ekasi/480 . 337

SFX 10210 Y 2
SFX 10210 kti eka/481 . 337
SFX 10210 ktis ekasi/481 . 337

SFX 10211 Y 2
SFX 10211 kti eka/482 . 337
SFX 10211 ktis ekasi/482 . 337

SFX 10221 Y 1
SFX 10221 kti ekie/483 . 337

SFX 10222 Y 1
SFX 10222 ktis ekie/484 . 337

SFX 10223 Y 2
SFX 10223 kti ko/485 . 338
SFX 10223 ktis kosi/485 . 338

SFX 10224 Y 2
SFX 10224 kti ko/486 . 338
SFX 10224 ktis kosi/486 . 338

SFX 10225 Y 2
SFX 10225 kti ko/487 . 338
SFX 10225 ktis kosi/487 . 338

SFX 10229 Y 2
SFX 10229 ogti ogti/464 . 336
SFX 10229 ogtis ogtis/464 . 336

SFX 10230 Y 2
SFX 10230 ogti ogti/465 . 336
SFX 10230 ogtis ogtis/465 . 336

SFX 10231 Y 2
SFX 10231 ogti ogti/466 . 336
SFX 10231 ogtis ogtis/466 . 336

SFX 10232 Y 2
SFX 10232 ogti ogti/467 . 336
SFX 10232 ogtis ogtis/467 . 336

SFX 10233 Y 2
SFX 10233 ogti ogti/468 . 336
SFX 10233 ogtis ogtis/468 . 336

SFX 10234 Y 2
SFX 10234 ogti ogti/469 . 336
SFX 10234 ogtis ogtis/469 . 336

SFX 10235 Y 2
SFX 10235 ogti ogti/470 . 336
SFX 10235 ogtis ogtis/470 . 336

SFX 10236 Y 2
SFX 10236 ogti ogti/471 . 336
SFX 10236 ogtis ogtis/471 . 336

SFX 10237 Y 2
SFX 10237 ogti ogti/472 . 336
SFX 10237 ogtis ogtis/472 . 336

SFX 10238 Y 2
SFX 10238 ogti ogti/473 . 336
SFX 10238 ogtis ogtis/473 . 336

SFX 10249 Y 2
SFX 10249 ogti agia/474 . 337
SFX 10249 ogtis agiasi/474 . 337

SFX 10250 Y 2
SFX 10250 ogti agia/475 . 337
SFX 10250 ogtis agiasi/475 . 337

SFX 10251 Y 2
SFX 10251 ogti agia/476 . 337
SFX 10251 ogtis agiasi/476 . 337

SFX 10252 Y 2
SFX 10252 ogti agia/477 . 337
SFX 10252 ogtis agiasi/477 . 337

AF 10137,10138,10157,10177,65521 # 179
AF 10229,10230,10249,10269,65521 # 193
AF 10045,10046,10065,10085,65521 # 204
AF 10091,10092,10111,10131,65521 # 225
AF 10183,10184,10203,10223,65521 # 230
AF 10137,10138,10146,10157,10165,10177,10179,65521 # 392
