lt-LT_morphology.dic
aptikšti/204	11
apvogti/193	11
atpažinti/179	11
atsikimšti/225	13
atsilikti/230	13
beatlikti/230	11
beatpažinti/179	11
belikti/230	11
bepalikti/230	11
bepažinti/179	11
bevogti/193	11
įkimšti/225	11
iškimšti/225	11
išlikti/230	11
išpažinti/179	11
ištikšti/204	11
išvogti/193	11
kimšti/225	11
kimštis/225	13
likti/230	11
liktis/230	13
neapsipažinti/179	34
neapsivogti/193	34
neaptikšti/204	33
neapvogti/193	33
neatkimšti/225	33
neatlikti/230	33
neatpažinti/179	33
neatsilikti/230	34
nebeatlikti/230	33
nebeatpažinti/179	33
nebeatsilikti/230	34
nebeišlikti/230	33
nebeišvogti/193	33
nebekimšti/225	33
nebelikti/230	33
nebepalikti/230	33
nebepavogti/193	33
nebepažinti/179	33
nebeprikimšti/225	33
nebepripažinti/179	33
nebeprisikimšti/225	34
nebeprisipažinti/179	34
nebesusipažinti/179	34
nebeužkimšti/225	33
nebeužsikimšti/225	34
nebeužsilikti/230	34
nebevogti/193	33
neiškimšti/225	33
neišpažinti/179	33
neištikšti/204	33
neišvogti/193	33
nekimšti/225	33
nelikti/230	33
nenuvogti/193	33
nepasilikti/230	34
nepasivogti/193	34
nepavogti/193	33
nepažinti/392	33
neprasivogti/193	34
neprikimšti/225	33
nepripažinti/179	33
neprisikimšti/225	34
neprisipažinti/179	34
neprisivogti/193	34
nepritikšti/204	33
neprivogti/193	33
nesikimšti/225	34
nesukimšti/225	33
nesusikimšti/225	34
nesusipažinti/179	34
netikšti/204	33
neužkimšti/225	33
neužsikimšti/225	34
neužtikšti/204	33
nevogti/193	33
nuvogti/193	11
palikti/230	11
pasivogti/193	13
pavogti/193	11
pažinti/179	11
prasivogti/193	13
prikimšti/225	11
pripažinti/179	11
prisikimšti/225	13
prisipažinti/179	13
prisivogti/193	13
privogti/193	11
sukimšti/225	11
susikimšti/225	13
susipažinti/179	13
teatlikti/230	11
tebeapvogti/193	11
tebeatlikti/230	11
tebeatpažinti/179	11
tebeišlikti/230	11
tebepalikti/230	11
tebepažinti/179	11
tebetikšti/204	11
tebevogti/193	11
teišpažinti/179	11
telikti/230	11
tenepalikti/230	11
tepasilikti/230	13
tepripažinti/179	11
tesusipažinti/179	13
teužtikšti/204	11
tevogti/193	11
tikšti/204	11
užsikimšti/225	13
užtikšti/204	11
